Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
CHAPTER 7
CONTROL OF SOIL EROSION AND SEDIMENTATION

Sec.

Cross references.

- Duties of Cooperative Extension Service of the University of Georgia with regard to conservation of soil used for agricultural purposes,

§

2-6-1

et seq.

Shore protection, T. 12, C. 5, A. 4, P. 2.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Erosion and sedimentation control, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-7.

Law reviews.

-
For article discussing regulation of selected activities to effect environmental planning, see 10 Ga. L. Rev. 53 (1975). For article discussing nuisances as "hidden liens," see 14 Ga. St. B.J. 32 (1977). For article surveying recent legislative and judicial developments in zoning, planning, and environmental law, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 89 (1979). For survey article on environment, natural resources, and land use, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 145 (1982). For article surveying 1999 Eleventh Circuit cases involving environmental law, see 51 Mercer L. Rev. 1151 (2000).
For note on 1995 amendments of Code sections in this chapter, see 12 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 39 (1995). For note on the 2003 amendments of Code sections in this chapter, see 20 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 244 (2003).

12-7-1. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Erosion and Sedimentation Act of 1975."

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 994, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 224, § 5.)

Law reviews.

-
For article, "From Marshes to Mountains, Wetlands Come Under State Regulation," see 41 Mercer L. Rev. 865 (1990). For article, "Local Government Litigation: Some Pivotal Principles," see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2003). For annual survey of zoning and land use law, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 477 (2006).

12-7-2. Legislative findings; policy of state and intent of chapter.

It is found that soil erosion and sediment deposition onto lands and into waters within the watersheds of this state are occurring as a result of widespread failure to apply proper soil erosion and sedimentation control practices in land clearing, soil movement, and construction activities and that such erosion and sediment deposition result in pollution of state waters and damage to domestic, agricultural, recreational, fish and wildlife, and other resource uses. It is therefore declared to be the policy of this state and the intent of this chapter to strengthen and extend the present erosion and sediment control activities and programs of this state and to provide for the establishment and implementation of a state-wide comprehensive soil erosion and sediment control program to conserve and protect the land, water, air, and other resources of this state.

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 994, § 2; Ga. L. 2003, p. 224, § 5.)

12-7-3. Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

"Board" means the Board of Natural Resources.

"Buffer" means the area of land immediately adjacent to the banks of state waters in its natural state of vegetation, which facilitates the protection of water quality and aquatic habitat.

(2.1) "Coastal marshlands" shall have the same meaning as in Code Section 12-5-282.

"Commission" means the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission.

"Director" means the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

"District" means any one of the soil and water conservation districts of this state.

"Division" means the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

"Drainage structure" means a device composed of a virtually nonerodible material such as concrete, steel, plastic, or other such material that conveys water from one place to another by intercepting the flow and carrying it to a release point for storm-water management, drainage control, or flood control purposes.

"Erosion and sediment control plan" or "plan" means a plan for the control of soil erosion and sediment resulting from a land-disturbing activity.

"Land-disturbing activity" means any activity which may result in soil erosion from water or wind and the movement of sediments into state water or onto lands within the state, including, but not limited to, clearing, dredging, grading, excavating, transporting, and filling of land but not including agricultural practices as described in paragraph (5) of Code Section 12-7-17.

(9.1) "Larger common plan of development or sale" means a contiguous area where multiple separate and distinct construction activities are occurring under one plan of development or sale. For purposes of this paragraph, "plan" means an announcement; piece of documentation such as a sign, public notice or hearing, sales pitch, advertisement, drawing, permit application, zoning request, or computer design; or physical demarcation such as boundary signs, lot stakes, or surveyor markings, indicating that construction activities may occur on a specific plot.

"Local issuing authority" means the governing authority of any county or municipality which is certified pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 12-7-8. Said term shall also include any water authority or water and sewer authority which has been authorized by local law to be responsible for storm-water management and to implement and enforce all related ordinances and regulations and, pursuant to an intergovernmental agreement with each governing authority of an applicable county or municipality, operates a storm-water utility and maintains the storm-water management system and soil erosion and sedimentation control permitting, inspection, and enforcement of such county or municipality.

(10.1) "Maintenance" means actions necessary or appropriate for retaining or restoring a currently serviceable improvement to the specified operable condition to achieve its maximum useful life. Maintenance includes emergency reconstruction of recently damaged parts of a currently serviceable structure so long as it occurs within a reasonable period of time after damage occurs. Maintenance does not include any modification that changes the character, scope, or size of the original design.

(10.2) "Manual for Erosion and Sediment Control in Georgia" or "manual" means the published guidance of the commission governing the design and practices to be utilized in the protection of this state's natural resources from erosion and sedimentation which shall be based foremost upon sound engineering principles and repeatable bench and field testing of structural and vegetative best management practices and which shall have the annual approval of the Erosion and Sediment Control Overview Council established pursuant to Code Section 12-7-7.1.

(10.3) "Operator" means the party or parties that have:

Operational control of construction project plans and specifications, including the ability to make modifications to those plans and specifications; or

Day-to-day operational control of those activities that are necessary to ensure compliance with a storm-water pollution prevention plan for the site or other permit conditions, such as a person authorized to direct workers at a site to carry out activities required by the storm-water pollution prevention plan or to comply with other permit conditions.

"Person" means any individual, partnership, firm, association, joint venture, public or private corporation, trust, estate, commission, board, public or private institution, utility, cooperative, state agency, municipality or other political subdivision of this state, any interstate body, or any other legal entity.

"Qualified personnel" means any person who meets or exceeds the education and training requirements of Code Section 12-7-19.

"Roadway drainage structure" means a device, such as a bridge, culvert, or ditch, composed of a virtually nonerodible material such as concrete, steel, plastic, or other such material that conveys water under a roadway by intercepting the flow on one side of a traveled way consisting of one or more defined lanes, with or without shoulder areas, and carrying water to a release point on the other side.

(13.1) "Serviceable" means usable in its current state or with minor maintenance but not so degraded as to essentially require reconstruction.

"Soil and water conservation district approved plan" means an erosion and sediment control plan approved in writing by a soil and water conservation district.

"State general permit" means the National Pollution Discharge Elimination System general permit or permits for storm-water runoff from construction activities as is now in effect or as may be amended or reissued in the future pursuant to the state's authority to implement the same through federal delegation under the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended, 33 U.S.C. Section 1251, et seq., and subsection (f) of Code Section 12-5-30.

"State waters" includes any and all rivers, streams, creeks, branches, lakes, reservoirs, ponds, drainage systems, springs, wells, and other bodies of surface or subsurface water, natural or artificial, lying within or forming a part of the boundaries of the state, which are not entirely confined and retained completely upon the property of a single individual, partnership, or corporation.

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 994, § 3; Ga. L. 1980, p. 942, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 12; Ga. L. 1988, p. 269, § 24; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1295, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1650, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1430, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 224, § 5; Ga. L. 2015, p. 35, § 3/HB 397; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1051, § 1/SB 101; Ga. L. 2020, p. 488, § 1/SB 445.)

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, added the second sentence in paragraph (10).

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, in paragraph (9) (now paragraph 11)), a comma was inserted following "firm".

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, "State" was substituted for "state" in paragraph (2) (now paragraph (3)).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2015, paragraphs (10.1) and (10.2), as added and redesignated by Ga. L. 2015, p. 35,

§

3/HB 397, were redesignated as paragraphs (10.2) and (10.3), respectively.

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2015, p. 1051,

§

4/SB 101, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations and shall become effective on December 31, 2015, for all other purposes." This Act was signed by the Governor on May 6, 2015.

Law reviews.

-
For survey article on environment, natural resources, and land use, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 145 (1982). For article, "Georgia Wetlands:
Values, Trends, and Legal Status," see 41 Mercer L. Rev. 791 (1990). For survey article on real property law, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 193 (2015).
For comment, " 'Wrest' in Peace:
The Effect of the Georgia Environmental Protection Division's â€˜Wrested Vegetation Rule' on Coastal Salt Marshes," see 32 Georgia St. U.L. Rev. 953 (2016).

12-7-4. Adoption of comprehensive ordinances relating to land-disturbing activities; delegation of responsibility to planning and zoning commission; other local ordinances relating to land development; effect of chapter on design professionals.

The governing authority of each county and each municipality shall adopt a comprehensive ordinance establishing the procedures governing land-disturbing activities which are conducted within their respective boundaries. Such ordinances shall be consistent with the standards provided by this chapter. Local governing authorities shall have the authority, by such ordinance, to delegate in whole or in part the responsibilities of the governing authorities, as set forth in this chapter, to any constitutional or statutory local planning and zoning commission. Where the local governing authority deems it appropriate, it may integrate such provisions with other local ordinances relating to land development including but not limited to tree protection, flood plain protection, stream buffers, or storm-water management; and the properties to which any of the types of ordinances identified in this Code section shall apply, whether or not such ordinances are integrated, shall include without limitation property owned by the local governing authority or by a local school district, except as otherwise provided by Code Section 12-7-17.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as to limit or exclude any design professional, including but not limited to any professional engineer or registered land surveyor, or Natural Resource Conservation Service employee, within any county, municipality, or consolidated government in this state from performing such professional services as may be incidental to the practice of his or her profession, including any and all soil erosion and sedimentation control plans, storm-water management reports including hydrological studies, and site plans, when such professional has demonstrated competence through such qualifications, education, experience, and licensing as required for practice in this state by applicable provisions of Title 43 related to such profession; provided, however, that any such person shall be subject to the requirements of Code Section 12-7-19.

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 994, § 5; Ga. L. 1980, p. 942, § 4; Ga. L. 2003, p. 224, § 5; Ga. L. 2003, p. 270, § 1.)

Code Commission notes.

- The amendment of subsection (a) of this Code section by Ga. L. 2003, p. 224,

§

5, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2003, p. 270,

§

1. See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921).

12-7-5. Adoption of rules and regulations for localities without ordinances.

The board, by appropriate rules and regulations, shall adopt the procedures governing land-disturbing activities which are conducted in those counties and municipalities which do not have in effect an ordinance conforming to this chapter. Such rules and regulations shall be developed by the division in consultation with the commission and shall contain provisions which meet those minimum requirements set forth in Code Section 12-7-6.

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 994, § 6; Ga. L. 1988, p. 269, § 25; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1295, § 2; Ga. L. 2003, p. 224, § 5.)

Cross references.

- Powers of the commission generally,

§

2-6-27

.

Powers of districts generally,

§

2-6-33

.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Erosion and sedimentation control, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-7.

12-7-6. Best management practices; minimum requirements for rules, regulations, ordinances, or resolutions.

Best management practices as set forth in subsection (b) of this Code section shall be required for all land-disturbing activities. Proper design, installation, and maintenance of best management practices shall constitute a complete defense to any action by the director or to any other allegation of noncompliance with paragraph (2) of this subsection or any substantially similar terms contained in a permit for the discharge of storm water issued pursuant to subsection (f) of Code Section 12-5-30. As used in this subsection, the terms "proper design" and "properly designed" mean designed in accordance with the hydraulic design specifications contained in the "Manual for Erosion and Sediment Control in Georgia" specified in subsection (b) of this Code section.

A discharge of storm-water runoff from disturbed areas where best management practices have not been properly designed, installed, and maintained shall constitute a separate violation of any land-disturbing permit issued by a local issuing authority or of any state general permit issued by the division pursuant to subsection (f) of Code Section 12-5-30 for each day on which such discharge results in the turbidity of receiving waters being increased by more than 25 nephelometric turbidity units for waters supporting warm water fisheries or by more than ten nephelometric turbidity units for waters classified as trout waters. The turbidity of the receiving waters shall be measured in accordance with guidelines to be issued by the director. This paragraph shall not apply to any land disturbance associated with the construction of single-family homes which are not part of a larger common plan of development or sale unless the planned disturbance for such construction is equal to or greater than five acres.

Failure properly to design, install, or maintain best management practices shall constitute a violation of any land-disturbing permit issued by a local issuing authority or of any state general permit issued by the division pursuant to subsection (f) of Code Section 12-5-30 for each day on which such failure occurs.

The director may require, in accordance with regulations adopted by the board, reasonable and prudent monitoring of the turbidity level of receiving waters into which discharges from land-disturbing activities occur.

The rules and regulations, ordinances, or resolutions adopted pursuant to this chapter for the purpose of governing land-disturbing activities shall require, as a minimum, protections at least as stringent as the state general permit; and best management practices, including sound conservation and engineering practices to prevent and minimize erosion and resultant sedimentation, which are consistent with, and no less stringent than, those practices contained in the "Manual for Erosion and Sediment Control In Georgia" published by the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission as of January 1 of the year in which the land-disturbing activity was permitted, as well as the following:

Stripping of vegetation, regrading, and other development activities shall be conducted in such a manner so as to minimize erosion;

Cut and fill operations must be kept to a minimum;

Development plans must conform to topography and soil type, so as to create the lowest practicable erosion potential;

Whenever feasible, natural vegetation shall be retained, protected, and supplemented;

The disturbed area and the duration of exposure to erosive elements shall be kept to a practicable minimum;

Disturbed soil shall be stabilized as quickly as practicable;

Temporary vegetation or mulching shall be employed to protect exposed critical areas during development;

Permanent vegetation and structural erosion control measures must be installed as soon as practicable;

To the extent necessary, sediment in run-off water must be trapped by the use of debris basins, sediment basins, silt traps, or similar measures until the disturbed area is stabilized. As used in this paragraph, a disturbed area is stabilized when it is brought to a condition of continuous compliance with the requirements of this chapter;

Adequate provisions must be provided to minimize damage from surface water to the cut face of excavations or the sloping surfaces of fills;

Cuts and fills may not endanger adjoining property;

Fills may not encroach upon natural watercourses or constructed channels in a manner so as to adversely affect other property owners;

Grading equipment must cross flowing streams by the means of bridges or culverts, except when such methods are not feasible, provided, in any case, that such crossings must be kept to a minimum;

Land-disturbing activity plans for erosion and sedimentation control shall include provisions for treatment or control of any source of sediments and adequate sedimentation control facilities to retain sediments on site or preclude sedimentation of adjacent waters beyond the levels specified in subsection (a) of this Code section;

There is established a 25 foot buffer along the banks of all state waters, as measured horizontally from the point where vegetation has been wrested by normal stream flow or wave action, except:

As provided by paragraphs (16) and (17) of this subsection;

Where the director determines to allow a variance that is at least as protective of natural resources and the environment;

Where otherwise allowed by the director pursuant to Code Section 12-2-8;

Where a drainage structure or a roadway drainage structure must be constructed, provided that adequate erosion control measures are incorporated in the project plans and specifications and are implemented;

Along any ephemeral stream. As used in this division, the term "ephemeral stream" means a stream:

That under normal circumstances has water flowing only during and for a short duration after precipitation events;

That has the channel located above the ground-water table year round;

For which ground water is not a source of water; and

For which runoff from precipitation is the primary source of water flow; or

Where shoreline stabilization is installed; provided, however, that this exception shall be limited to the construction of bulkheads and sea walls only to the extent required to prevent the erosion of the shoreline. This exception shall be limited to Lake Oconee and Lake Sinclair and shall be limited to the duration of such construction.

Unless exempted under division (v) of this subparagraph, buffers of at least 25 feet established pursuant to Part 6 of Article 5 of Chapter 5 of this title shall remain in force unless a variance is granted by the director as provided in this paragraph.

No land-disturbing activities shall be conducted within any such buffer; and a buffer shall remain in its natural, undisturbed state of vegetation until all land-disturbing activities on the construction site are completed, except as otherwise provided by this paragraph. Once the final stabilization of the site is achieved, a buffer may be thinned or trimmed of vegetation as long as a protective vegetative cover remains to protect water quality and aquatic habitat and a natural canopy is left in sufficient quantity to keep shade on the stream bed; provided, however, that any person constructing a single-family residence, when such residence is constructed by or under contract with the owner for his or her own occupancy, may thin or trim vegetation in a buffer at any time as long as protective vegetative cover remains to protect water quality and aquatic habitat and a natural canopy is left in sufficient quantity to keep shade on the stream bed.

On or before December 31, 2004, the board shall adopt rules which contain specific criteria for the grant or denial by the director of requests for variances. After such date, no variance shall be granted by the director which is not consistent with the criteria contained in such rules. Such rules shall provide, at a minimum, that the director shall consider granting a variance in the following circumstances:

Where a proposed land-disturbing activity within the buffer would require the landowner to acquire a permit from the United States Army Corps of Engineers under Section 404 of the federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendment of 1972, 33 U.S.C. Section 1344, and the Corps of Engineers has approved a mitigation plan to be implemented as a condition of such a permit;

Where the landowner provides a plan satisfactory to the director that shows that, even with the proposed land-disturbing activity within the buffer, the completed project will result in maintained or improved water quality downstream of the project; or

Where a project with a proposed land-disturbing activity within the buffer is located in or upstream and within ten linear miles of a stream segment listed as impaired under Section 303(d) of the federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendment of 1972, 33 U.S.C. Section 1313(d) and the landowner provides a plan satisfactory to the director that shows that the completed project will result in maintained or improved water quality in such listed stream segment and that the project has no adverse impact relative to the pollutants of concern in such stream segment.

All projects covered under divisions (i), (ii), and (iii) of this subparagraph shall meet all criteria set forth in rules for specific variance criteria adopted by the board by December 31, 2004.

The buffer shall not apply to the following land-disturbing activities, provided that they occur at an angle, as measured from the point of crossing, within 25 degrees of perpendicular to the stream; cause a width of disturbance of not more than 50 feet within the buffer; and adequate erosion control measures are incorporated into the project plans and specifications and are implemented:

Stream crossings for water lines; or

Stream crossings for sewer lines;

There is established a 50 foot buffer, as measured horizontally from the point where vegetation has been wrested by normal stream flow or wave action, along the banks of any state waters classified as "trout streams" pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 5 of this title except where a roadway drainage structure must be constructed; provided, however, that small springs and streams classified as trout streams which discharge an average annual flow of 25 gallons per minute or less shall have a 25 foot buffer or they may be piped, at the discretion of the landowner, pursuant to the terms of a rule providing for a general variance promulgated by the board providing for notice to the division or local issuing authority of the location and extent of the piping and prescribed methodology for minimizing the impact of such piping and for measuring the volume of water discharged by the stream. Any such pipe must stop short of the downstream landowner's property, and the landowner must comply with the buffer requirement for any adjacent trout streams. The director may grant a variance from such buffer to allow land-disturbing activity, provided that adequate erosion control measures are incorporated in the project plans and specifications and are implemented. The following requirements shall apply to any such buffer:

No land-disturbing activities shall be conducted within a buffer and a buffer shall remain in its natural, undisturbed state of vegetation until all land-disturbing activities on the construction site are completed. Once the final stabilization of the site is achieved, a buffer may be thinned or trimmed of vegetation as long as a protective vegetative cover remains to protect water quality and aquatic habitat and a natural canopy is left in sufficient quantity to keep shade on the stream bed; provided, however, that any person constructing a single-family residence, when such residence is constructed by or under contract with the owner for his or her own occupancy, may thin or trim vegetation in a buffer at any time as long as protective vegetative cover remains to protect water quality and aquatic habitat and a natural canopy is left in sufficient quantity to keep shade on the stream bed;

On or before December 31, 2000, the board shall adopt rules which contain specific criteria for the grant or denial by the director of requests for variances. After such date, no variance shall be granted by the director which is not consistent with the criteria contained in such rules; provided, however, that, should the board fail to adopt rules which contain specific criteria for the grant or denial of requests for variances by the director on or before December 31, 2000, the authority of the director to issue such variances shall be suspended until the board adopts such rules; and

The buffer shall not apply to the following land-disturbing activities, provided that they occur at an angle, as measured from the point of crossing, within 25 degrees of perpendicular to the stream; they cause a width of disturbance of not more than 50 feet within the buffer; and adequate erosion control measures are incorporated into the project plans and specifications and are implemented:

Stream crossings for water lines; or

Stream crossings for sewer lines; and

There is established a 25 foot buffer along coastal marshlands, as measured horizontally from the coastal marshland-upland interface, as determined in accordance with Part 4 of Article 4 of Chapter 5 of this title, the "Coastal Marshlands Protection Act of 1970," and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, except:

Where the director determines to allow a variance that is at least as protective of natural resources and the environment;

Where otherwise allowed by the director pursuant to Code Section 12-2-8;

Where an alteration within the buffer area has been authorized pursuant to Code Section 12-5-286;

For maintenance of any currently serviceable structure, landscaping, or hardscaping, including bridges, roads, parking lots, golf courses, golf cart paths, retaining walls, bulkheads, and patios; provided, however, that if such maintenance requires any land-disturbing activity, adequate erosion control measures are incorporated into the project plans and specifications and such measures are fully implemented;

Where a drainage structure or roadway drainage structure is constructed or maintained; provided, however, that adequate erosion control measures are incorporated into the project plans and specifications and such measures are fully implemented;

On the landward side of any currently serviceable shoreline stabilization structure; and

For the maintenance of any manmade storm-water detention basin, golf course pond, or impoundment that is located entirely within the property of a single individual, partnership, or corporation; provided, however, that adequate erosion control measures are incorporated into the project plans and specifications and such measures are fully implemented.

No land-disturbing activity shall be conducted within any such buffer and a buffer shall remain in its current, undisturbed state of vegetation until all land-disturbing activities on the construction site are completed, except as otherwise provided by this paragraph. Once the final stabilization of the site is achieved, a buffer may be thinned or trimmed of vegetation so long as a protective vegetative cover remains to protect water quality and aquatic habitat; provided, however, that any person constructing a single-family residence, when such residence is constructed by or under contract with the owner for his or her own occupancy, may thin or trim vegetation in a buffer at any time so long as a protective vegetative cover remains to protect water quality and aquatic habitat.

On or before December 31, 2015, the board shall promulgate rules and regulations that:

Contain criteria for the grant or denial by the director of requests for variances pursuant to this paragraph, including where an alteration within the buffer area has been authorized pursuant to a permit issued by the United States Army Corps of Engineers under Section 404 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act of 1972, as amended, or Section 10 of the Rivers and Harbors Act of 1899; provided, however, that adequate erosion control measures are incorporated into the project plans and specifications and such measures are fully implemented; and

Provide for variances by rule, subject to specified conditions, for certain categories of activities within the buffer that will have minimal impact on the water quality or aquatic habitat of the adjacent marsh, including where the area within the buffer is not more than 500 square feet; provided, however, that adequate erosion control measures are incorporated into the project plans and specifications and such measures are fully implemented.

The board may adopt rules and regulations that provide for an expedited process for certain categories of activities within the buffer based on the size, scope, location, and character of the proposed activity within the buffer.

The buffer requirements of this paragraph shall not apply to crossings for utility lines that cause a width of disturbance of not more than 50 feet within the buffer; provided, however, that adequate erosion control measures are incorporated into the project plans and specifications and such measures are fully implemented.

The buffer shall not apply to:

Any land-disturbing activity conducted pursuant to and in compliance with a valid and effective land-disturbing permit issued subsequent to April 22, 2014, and prior to December 31, 2015; provided, however, that adequate erosion control measures are incorporated into the project plans and specifications and such measures are fully implemented; or

Any lot for which the preliminary plat has been approved prior to December 31, 2015, if roadways, bridges, or water and sewer lines have been extended to such lot prior to December 31, 2015, and if the requirement to maintain a 25 foot buffer would consume at least 18 percent of the high ground of the platted lot otherwise available for development; provided, however, that adequate erosion control measures are incorporated into the project plans and specifications and such measures are fully implemented.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall prevent any local issuing authority from adopting rules and regulations, ordinances, or resolutions which contain stream buffer requirements that exceed the minimum requirements in subsection (b) of this Code section.

The fact that land-disturbing activity for which a permit has been issued results in injury to the property of another shall neither constitute proof of nor create a presumption of a violation of the standards provided for in this Code section or the terms of the permit.

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 994, § 4; Ga. L. 1980, p. 942, § 3; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1295, § 3; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 12; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1650, § 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 12; Ga. L. 1995, p. 150, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1430, § 2; Ga. L. 2003, p. 224, § 5; Ga. L. 2004, p. 352, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 12/SB 465; Ga. L. 2009, p. 619, § 1/SB 155; Ga. L. 2010, p. 523, § 1/HB 1359; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 12/HB 942; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1051, §§ 2, 3/SB 101; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 12/HB 737; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 12/HB 323.)

Cross references.

- Establishment of land-use regulations within districts generally,

§

2-6-35

.

Prohibition against cutting, harvesting, and other uses of sea oats,

§

12-5-310

et seq.

Stream buffers,

§§

12-2-8

,

12-5-451

,

12-5-453

,

12-5-582

.

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1991, a misspelling of "vegetation" was corrected in paragraph (8) (now paragraph (b)(8)).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, "State Soil and Water Conservation Commission" was substituted for "Georgia Soil and Water Conservation Commission" near the end of subsection (b) and a comma was substituted for a semicolon following "are not feasible" in paragraph (b)(13).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2015, "December 31, 2015" was substituted for "the effective date of this Act" in division (b)(17)(F)(i), and "December 31, 2015," was twice substituted for "the effective date of this Act" in division (b)(17)(F)(ii).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2016, a comma was removed following "natural, undisturbed" in subparagraph (b)(16)(A).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2015, p. 1051,

§

4/SB 101, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations and shall become effective on December 31, 2015, for all other purposes." This Act was signed by the Governor on May 6, 2015.

Law reviews.

-
For article on the 2004 amendment of this Code section, see 21 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 8 (2004). For survey article on real property law, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 193 (2015).